Hawaii statutes.
§302D-15 Appeals; charter applications, renewals,
or revocations. (a) The board shall have the power to decide appeals of
decisions by an authorizer to deny the approval of a charter application, deny
renewal of a charter contract, or revoke a charter school's charter contract.
An appeal shall be filed with the board within twenty-one calendar days of the
receipt of the notification of denial or revocation. Only a party whose
charter application has been denied, whose charter contract renewal has been
denied, or whose charter contract has been revoked may initiate an appeal under
this section for cause. The board shall review an appeal and issue a final
decision within sixty calendar days of the filing of the appeal.

(b) The board shall serve as the final
arbitrator of appeals authorized by subsection (a).

(c) A party shall not be entitled to a hearing
before the board under this section until it has exhausted all available
administrative remedies.

(d) The board shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 to implement this section. [L 2012, c 130, pt of §2; am L 2013, c
159, §10]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next